Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.110

Authority of the state or local jurisdictions. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

Chapter 207, Laws of 2024 is not intended to and does not diminish the authority of the state or local jurisdictions to enter into government-to-government agreements with Indian tribes, including mutual aid and other interlocal agreements, concerning the movement of persons within their jurisdiction, does not diminish the validity or enforceability of any such agreements, and is not intended to and does not expand or diminish the authority of the state or local jurisdictions to arrest individuals over whom they have jurisdiction within Indian reservations.

[ 2024 c 207 s 12.]